Hawaii, session 2026, SB2182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 516-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§516-2  Applicability.  This chapter applies to all lands leased as residential lots [which] that are owned or held privately or owned by the State or its political subdivisions, except: (1)  Hawaiian home lands [which] that are subject to Article XII of the Constitution of the State [and lands]; (2)  Lands owned or held by the federal government[.]; and (3)  State and county lands leased after July 1, 2026, for an initial period of not less than ninety-nine years. This chapter is not meant to supersede or preclude any other remedy at law available to residential leasehold lessees or the State, including those available under chapter 480." SECTION 2.  Section 516D-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§516D-1  Applicability.  This chapter applies to all lands on which are situated either residential condominium property regimes created under chapter 514B or any predecessor thereto, or cooperative housing corporations, which are owned or held privately or by the State or by the counties, except: (1)  Hawaiian home lands [which] that are subject to Article XII of the Constitution of the State [and lands]; (2)  Lands owned or held by the federal government[.]; and (3)  State and county lands leased after July 1, 2026, for an initial period of not less than ninety-nine years." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________